test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-makw9_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - makõ2: # Noun (9) makõ2 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     makõ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom: makõ
     makõ+Hom2+N+Sg+Gen: [makõ, magõhõ]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Sg+Par: [makõt, magõhõt]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Sg+Ill: [makkõhe, magõhõhe, makkõdõ, magõhõdõ]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Sg+Ine: [makõn, makõh, makõhn, magõhõn, magõhõh, magõhõhn]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Sg+Ela: [makõst, magõhõst]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Sg+All: [makõlõ, magõhõlõ]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Sg+Ade: [makõl, magõhõl]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Sg+Abl: [makõlt, magõhõlt]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Sg+Tra: [makõs, magõhõs]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Sg+Ter: [makõniq, magõhõniq]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Sg+Abe: [makõldaq, magõhõldaq]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Sg+Com: [makõgaq, magõhõgaq]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom: [makõq, magõhõq]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Pl+Gen: [makkidõ, magõhidõ, makkiidõ, magõhiidõ]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Pl+Par: [makkit, magõhit, makkiid,  magõhiid]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Pl+Ill: [makkihe, magõhihe, makkiihe, magõhiihe, makkidõ, makkiidõ, magõhiidõ]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Pl+Ine: [makkin, magõhin, magõhiin, makkih, makkiin, makkiihn, makkiih, magõhih, magõhiih, makkihn, magõhihn, magõhiihn]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Pl+Ela: [makkist, magõhist, makkiist, magõhiist]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Pl+All: [makkilõ, magõhilõ, makiilõ, makkiilõ, magõhiilõ]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Pl+Ade: [makkil, magõhil, makkiil, magõhiil]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Pl+Abl: [makkilt, magõhilt, makkiilt, magõhiilt]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Pl+Tra: [makkis, magõhis, makkiis, magõhiis]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Pl+Ter: [makkiniq, magõhiniq, makkiiniq, magõhiiniq]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Pl+Abe: [makkildaq, magõhildaq, makkiildaq, magõhiildaq]
     makõ+Hom2+N+Pl+Com: [makkidõgaq, magõhidõgaq, makkiidõgaq, magõhiidõgaq]
